Utah statutes.
76-6-518.   Criminal simulation.

(1)  A person is guilty of criminal simulation if, with intent to defraud another:

(a)  he makes or alters an object in whole or in part so that it appears to have value because of age, antiquity, rarity, source, or authorship that it does not have;

(b)  he sells, passes, or otherwise utters an object so made or altered;

(c)  he possesses an object so made or altered with intent to sell, pass, or otherwise utter it; or

(d)  he authenticates or certifies an object so made or altered as genuine or as different from what it is.

(2)  Criminal simulation is punishable as follows:

(a)  If the value defrauded or intended to be defrauded is less than $500, the offense is a class B misdemeanor.

(b)  If the value defrauded or intended to be defrauded is or exceeds $500 but is less than $1,500, the offense is a class A misdemeanor.

(c)  If the value defrauded or intended to be defrauded is or exceeds $1,500 but is less than  $5,000, the offense is a felony of the third degree.

(d)  If the value defrauded or intended to be defrauded is or exceeds $5,000, the offense is a felony of the second degree.



Amended by Chapter 193, 2010 General Session

